Wisconsin, session 2025, AB981.
do enact as follows:AB981,11Section 1. 20.370 (9) (hv) of the statutes is amended to read:AB981,2,5220.370 (9) (hv) Fee amounts for statewide automated issuing system. All 3moneys received from the deductions made under ss. 23.176 (4) (d), 23.47 (3) (e), 4and 29.024 (6) (ag) to be used for payments to a person contracted under ss. 23.176 5(3) (f) 3., 23.47 (3) (c), and 29.024 (6) (a) 4. as required by the contract.AB981,26Section 2. 23.176 of the statutes is created to read:AB981,2,7723.176 Foraging permit. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB981,2,98(a) “Forage” means to collect a plant or fungus from its natural habitat for a 9food, medicinal, or other use.AB981,2,1210(b) “Proof” means the original foraging permit issued by the department or an 11agent appointed under sub. (3) (f) 2. or any alternative form of proof designated by 12rule under s. 23.47 (1).AB981,2,1313(c) “Vehicle admission area” has the meaning given in s. 27.01 (7) (a) 3.AB981,3,614(2) Permit required. (a) No person may forage on land owned by the state, 15excluding a vehicle admission area, unless the department or an agent appointed 1under sub. (3) (f) 2. has issued to the person a foraging permit. A person shall carry 2proof of the foraging permit at all times while the person is foraging on land owned 3by the state or while in possession of plants or fungi foraged from land owned by the 4state, unless otherwise required by this chapter or unless otherwise authorized or 5required by the department. The person shall exhibit the proof to the department 6or its wardens or other law enforcement officers on demand.AB981,3,87(b) A foraging permit issued under this section does not authorize a person to 8forage in an area on land owned by the state where foraging is prohibited.AB981,3,149(3) Issuance. (a) The department shall issue a foraging permit to a person 10who applies for the permit and who pays the fees required under sub. (4). The 11application for a foraging permit shall be on the form and contain the information 12required by the department. The department or an agent appointed under par. (f) 132. may not issue a foraging permit to the applicant until the applicant complies with 14the requirements specified in this paragraph.AB981,3,1615(b) A foraging permit issued under this section is valid for the calendar year in 16which it is issued.AB981,3,1817(c) Each foraging permit issued under this section shall contain the name and 18address of the permit holder and other information required by the department.AB981,3,2019(d) The department shall prepare, procure the printing of, and supply all 20necessary forms for applications and foraging permits issued under this section.AB981,3,2221(e) The department may issue customer identification numbers as part of a 22statewide automated system for issuing foraging permits under par. (f) 3.AB981,3,2423(f) In the course of issuing permits under this section, the department may do 24any of the following:AB981,4,111. Directly issue the permits.AB981,4,322. Appoint persons who are not employees of the department to issue the 3permits as agents of the department.AB981,4,543. Contract with persons who are not employees of the department to operate 5a statewide automated system for issuing permits.AB981,4,76(g) The department may promulgate rules regulating the activities of persons 7who are authorized as agents under par. (f) 2.AB981,4,98(4) Fees. (a) A person who applies for a foraging permit under this section 9shall pay one of the following fees to the department, whichever is applicable:AB981,4,10101. For an adult, $40.AB981,4,11112. For a child 12 years of age or older, $20.AB981,4,12123. For a child under the age of 12, $0.AB981,4,1813(b) Any person, including the department, that issues a foraging permit under 14this section shall collect, in addition to the applicable fee under par. (a), an issuing 15fee of 75 cents for each permit issued to a person 12 years of age or older. An agent 16appointed under sub. (3) (f) 2. may retain 50 cents of each issuing fee for each 17permit. Any issuing fee collected by an employee of the department shall be 18remitted to the department together with the fee under par. (a).AB981,4,2319(c) If the department enters into a contract under sub. (3) (f) 3., the 20department may deduct a portion of each fee collected under pars. (a) and (b) for 21payment to persons contracted to operate the statewide automated system under 22sub. (3) (f) 3. The department shall credit all of the amounts deducted to the 23appropriation account under s. 20.370 (9) (hv).AB981,5,724(d) The department shall establish a system under which the department 1pays each agent appointed under sub. (3) (f) 2. a payment of 50 cents for each time 2that the agent processes a transaction through the statewide automated system 3contracted for under sub. (3) (f) 3. The payment under this paragraph is in addition 4to any issuing fee retained by the agent under par. (b). The department shall make 5the payments under this paragraph by allowing the agent to retain an amount 6equal to the payments from the amounts that are collected by the agent and that 7would otherwise be remitted to the department.AB981,38Section 3. 23.47 (1) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB981,5,9923.47 (1) (e) A foraging permit under s. 23.176.AB981,410Section 4. 23.47 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB981,5,191123.47 (2) Electronic retrieval of information. If the department 12maintains a system under which the department stores information in an electronic 13format that relates to individuals who have been issued approvals under ch. 29, 14foraging permits under s. 23.176, or safety certificates under s. 23.33, 23.335, 30.74, 15or 350.055, the department may issue a conservation card to any individual who 16applies for the card for purposes of enabling the department to access information 17about that individual in the system. The department may authorize an individual 18to carry a conservation card or another form of identification, determined by the 19department, in lieu of carrying proof under sub. (1).AB981,5,2020